Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.080

Revocation and redetermination of minimum for infractions.

In case any person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, and under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board undergoing sentence in a state correctional institution commits any infractions of the rules and regulations of the institution, the board may revoke any order theretofore made determining the length of time such convicted person shall be imprisoned, including the forfeiture of all or a portion of credits earned or to be earned, pursuant to the provisions of RCW 9.95.110, and make a new order determining the length of time the person shall serve, not exceeding the maximum penalty provided by law for the crime for which the person was convicted, or the maximum fixed by the court. Such revocation and redetermination shall not be had except upon a hearing before the indeterminate sentence review board. At such hearing the convicted person shall be present and entitled to be heard and may present evidence and witnesses in his or her behalf.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 328; 1992 c 7 s 26; 1972 ex.s. c 68 s 1; 1961 c 106 s 1; 1955 c 133 s 9. Prior: 1947 c 92 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10249-2, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.